Montana, session 2025, LC3001.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-18-614, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-18-614. Military leave considered service. (1) A period of absence from employment with the
state, county, or city occurring either during a war involving the United States or in any other national
emergency and for 90 days thereafter for one of the following reasons is considered as service for the purpose
of determining the number of years of employment used in calculating vacation leave credits under this section:
(1)(a) having been ordered on active duty with the armed forces of the United States;
(2)(b) voluntary service on active duty in the armed forces or on ships operated by or for the United
States government; or
(3)(c) direct assignment to the United States department of defense for duties related to national
defense efforts if a leave of absence has been granted by the employer.
(2) Active duty for the state under the provisions of Title 32, U.S.C., and Title 10 must be
considered service for state employment. Any service under Title 32, U.S.C., and Title 10 before state
employment must also be considered service for state employment if the active duty service was for the state.
Official department of defense documentation must be used to determine if service was for the state."

Section 2. Section 2-18-618, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-18-618. Sick leave. (1) A permanent full-time employee earns sick leave credits from the first day
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC3001.1
of employment. For calculating sick leave credits, 2,080 hours (52 weeks x 40 hours) equals 1 year. Sick leave
credits must be credited at the end of each pay period. Sick leave credits are earned at the rate of 12 working
days for each year of service without restriction as to the number of working days that may be accumulated.
Employees are not entitled to be paid sick leave until they have been continuously employed 90 days.
(2) An employee may not accrue sick leave credits while in a leave-without-pay status.
(3) Permanent part-time employees are entitled to prorated leave benefits if they have worked the
qualifying period.
(4) Full-time temporary and seasonal employees are entitled to sick leave benefits provided they
work the qualifying period.
(5) A short-term worker may not earn sick leave credits.
(6) Except as otherwise provided in 2-18-1311, an employee who terminates employment with the
agency is entitled to a lump-sum payment equal to one-fourth of the pay attributed to the accumulated sick
leave. The pay attributed to the accumulated sick leave must be computed on the basis of the employee's
salary or wage at the time the employee terminates employment with the state, county, or city. Accrual of sick
leave credits for calculating the lump-sum payment provided for in this subsection begins July 1, 1971. The
payment is the responsibility of the agency in which the sick leave accrues. However, an employee does not
forfeit any sick leave rights or benefits accrued prior to July 1, 1971. However, when an employee transfers
between agencies within the same jurisdiction, the employee is not entitled to a lump-sum payment. In a
transfer between agencies, the receiving agency shall assume the liability for the accrued sick leave credits
earned after July 1, 1971, and transferred with the employee.
(7) An employee who receives a lump-sum payment pursuant to this section or who, pursuant to 2-
18-1311, converts unused sick leave to employer contributions to a health care expense trust account and who
is again employed by any agency may not be credited with sick leave for which the employee has previously
been compensated or for which the employee has received an employer contribution to the health care
expense trust account.
(8) Abuse of sick leave is cause for dismissal and forfeiture of the lump-sum payments provided for
in this section.
(9) An employee of a state agency may contribute any portion of the employee's accumulated sick
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC3001.1
leave or accumulated vacation leave to a nonrefundable sick leave fund for state employees and becomes
eligible to draw upon the fund if an extensive illness or accident exhausts the employee's accumulated sick
leave, irrespective of the employee's membership or nonmembership in the employee welfare benefit plan
established pursuant to 2-18-1304. The department of administration shall, in consultation with the state
employee group benefits advisory council, provided for in 2-15-1016, administer the sick leave fund and adopt
rules to implement this subsection.
(10) A local government may establish and administer through local rule a sick leave fund into which
its employees may contribute a portion of their accumulated sick leave or vacation leave.
(11) A permanent full-time employee with a 100% disability rating from the United States
department of veterans affairs shall earn sick leave credits at a rate of 15 working days for each year of service
without restriction as to the number of working days that may be accumulated. The employee shall provide the
human resources department with a copy of the employee's verification letter from the department of veterans
affairs in order to claim this benefit. Pursuant to subsection (1), employees are not entitled to be paid sick leave
until they have been continuously employed for 90 days."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****